Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-640.01
Cancer research; legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Cancer is a disease which strikes many Nebraska families and has an extremely detrimental effect on the lives of many Nebraskans and on the economy of this state;

(2) Cancer research is of utmost importance to Nebraskans in efforts to combat and control this serious disease;

(3) Nebraska is fortunate to have nationally recognized programs of cancer research in colleges of medicine located in Nebraska;

(4) The promotion of diversity of research has the greatest potential for significant advancement in finding the causes of cancer and the successful treatment of the disease; and

(5) It is in the best interests of the citizens of this state to strengthen existing cancer research programs and prevent duplication of research efforts by supporting and contracting with Nebraska colleges of medicine with existing programs to provide cancer research for the improvement of public health in Nebraska.

Laws 1993, LB 595, § 1.